Alaska statutes. Title 45. Trade and Commerce.
Chapter 12. Leases.

Revisor’s notes. —

This chapter is based on Article 2A of the Uniform Commercial Code.

Cross references. —

For cases of conflict between this chapter and AS 45.35, see AS

45.35.090

.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 115(a), ch. 44, SLA 2009, provides that the amendments made by ch. 44, SLA 2009, apply “to a document of title that is issued or a bailment that arises on or after January 1, 2010” and do “not apply to a document of title that is issued or a bailment that arises before January 1, 2010, even if the document of title or bailment would be subject to [ch. 44, SLA 2009] if the document of title was issued or the bailment arose on or after January 1, 2010.”
Section 115(b), ch. 44, SLA 2009 provides that ch. 44, SLA 2009, “does not apply to a right of action that has accrued before January 1, 2010.”
Section 116, ch. 44, SLA 2009, provides that “A document of title issued or a bailment that arises before January 1, 2010, and the rights, obligations, and interests flowing from that document or bailment are governed by a statute amended or repealed by [ch. 44, SLA 2009] as if the amendment or repeal had not occurred and may be terminated, completed, consummated, or enforced under that statute.”

Collateral references. —

Jeffrey J. Wong, Equipment Leasing (Matthew Bender).